Maryland, session 2026, HB0820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–315.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICIAL” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 4–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BEAR A SPECIAL
ENDORSEMENT THAT SHOWS THAT THE PERMIT HOLDER HAS ENHANCED
PRIVILEGES TO WEAR, CARRY, OR TRANSPORT A HANDGUN IF, BASED ON A
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0820*

HOUSE BILL 820
BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION, THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT THE PERMIT
HOLDER IS:
(1) A CURRENT EMPLOYEE OF THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT
WHO CURRENTLY HOLDS TOP SECRET/SENSITIVE COMPARTMENTED INFORMATION
SECURITY CLEARANCE; OR
(2) A RETIRED EMPLOYEE OF THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT
WHO HELD A TOP SECRET/SENSITIVE COMPARTMENTED INFORMATION SECURITY
CLEARANCE FOR AT LEAST 10 CONSECUTIVE YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
RETIREMENT FROM FEDERAL EMPLOYMENT.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW OR ORDINANCE THAT PROHIBITS THE
WEARING, CARRYING, OR TRANSPORTING OF A HANDGUN AT A PLACE, A PERSON
WHO HAS A PERMIT BEARING AN ENDORSEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION MAY WEAR,
CARRY, OR TRANSPORT A HANDGUN AT ANY PLACE WHERE A LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICIAL IS AUTHORIZED TO WEAR, CARRY, OR TRANSPORT A HANDGUN IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICIAL’S DUTIES.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.